project/egy.foma
!!!egy.foma!!!
!Serena Jeblee & Weston Feely
!4/21/13

! Read in Lexica by POS tag
read lexc egy_lex/adj.lexc
define adj;
read lexc egy_lex/adv.lexc
define adv;
read lexc egy_lex/conj.lexc
define conj;
read lexc egy_lex/noun.lexc
define noun;
read lexc egy_lex/prep.lexc
define prep;
read lexc egy_lex/pron.lexc
define pron;
read lexc egy_lex/verb.lexc
define verb;
read lexc egy_lex/negverb.lexc
define negverb;

! Combine lexica into single lexicon
regex adj | adv | conj | noun | prep | verb | negverb;
define Lexicon;

! Cleanup: remove morpheme boundaries
define Cleanup "^" -> 0;

! Define LEV->EGY lexical replacement rules
define WhereReplace {وين} -> {فين};	!wyn to fyn
define HowReplace1 {شلون} -> {ازي};	!shlwn to Azy
define HowReplace2 {كيف} -> {ازي};	!kyf to Azy
define WhatReplace {ليش} -> {ليه};	!lysh to lyh
define NowReplace {هلق} -> {دلوقتي};	!hlq to dlwqty
define HowMuchReplace {قديش} -> {بكام};	!qdysh to bkAm
define GoodReplace {منيح} -> {كويس};	!mnyH to kwys
define YesterdayReplace {مبارح} -> {امبارح};	!mbArH to AmbArH
define MyReplace {معي} -> {معيا};	!ma'i to ma'ayya	

!TODO
! to be able to: fii
! Em verb -> verb
! shw verb -> verb Ayh
! Aysh verb -> verb Ayh
! rH verb -> H verb
! mA verb -> mA-verb-sh
! rH verb to H-verb
! AmtY verb -> verb AmtY
! mA verb -> mA-verb-sh : including fy and End
! HAda, HAdi -> dA, dy, etc : see pg 17 M.Omar
! HA + noun -> noun dA/dy

! Compose lexicon with rules and cleanup rule to build grammar
define Grammar Lexicon		.o. 
		WhereReplace	.o.
		HowReplace1	.o.
		HowReplace2	.o.
		WhatReplace	.o.
		NowReplace	.o.
		HowMuchReplace	.o.
		GoodReplace	.o.
		YesterdayReplace	.o.
		MyReplace	.o.
               	Cleanup;
regex Grammar;

! Save into egy.bin and exit
!save stack egy.bin
!exit;
